Alaska, session 34, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 06 to read: 07 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (a) The legislature finds that 08 (1) the importance of a child's relationship with the child's siblings is well 09 recognized in law and science; 10 (2) the bonds between siblings are often irreplaceable; 11 (3) a foster child typically has some degree of contact or visitation with the 12 child's siblings, even when the child and the child's siblings do not reside together. 13 (b) It is the intent of the legislature 14 (1) that when a court reviews and approves a petition to adopt a child from 01 foster care, the court shall encourage the adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents, 02 kinship caregivers, and the department to consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee 03 and the child's siblings of facilitating post-adoption contact between the siblings that is similar 04 in nature and frequency to that which existed before the adoption; 05 (2) to promote a larger focus by the office of children's services and the courts 06 in permanency planning and adoption proceedings on the interests of the child and the child's 07 siblings separated by adoptive placements; and 08 (3) to encourage courts to include provisions in an adoption decree that 09 support ongoing postadoption contact between siblings. 10 * Sec. 2. AS 25.23.125 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 11 (d) If the person to be adopted is a minor who has been committed to the 12 custody of the Department of Family and Community Services under AS 47.10, and 13 the minor has siblings as defined in AS 25.23.130(g), the court shall determine 14 whether post-adoption visitation with the siblings is in the best interests of the minor 15 to be adopted and document the finding on the final decree of adoption. 16 * Sec. 3. AS 25.23.130(a) is amended to read: 17 (a) A final decree of adoption, whether issued by a court of this state or of any 18 other state, has the following effect as to matters within the jurisdiction or before a 19 court of this state: 20 (1) except with respect to a spouse of the petitioner and relatives of the 21 spouse, to relieve the natural parents of the adopted person of all parental rights and 22 responsibilities, and, except as provided in (c) of this section, to terminate all legal 23 relationships between the adopted person and the natural parents and other relatives of 24 the adopted person who are not siblings of the adopted person, so that the adopted 25 person thereafter is a stranger to these [THE] former relatives for all purposes, 26 including inheritance, unless the decree of adoption specifically provides for 27 continuation of inheritance rights, and the interpretation or construction of documents, 28 statutes, and instruments, whether executed before or after the adoption is decreed, 29 that do not expressly include the person by name or by some designation not based on 30 a parent and child or blood relationship; and 31 (2) to create the relationship of parent and child between the petitioner 01 and the adopted person, as if the adopted person were a legitimate blood descendant of 02 the petitioner, for all purposes, including inheritance and applicability of statutes, 03 documents, and instruments, whether executed before or after the adoption is decreed, 04 that do not expressly exclude an adopted person from their operation or effect. 05 * Sec. 4. AS 25.23.130 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (g) In this section, "sibling" means a person who 07 (1) is related to an individual by blood, adoption, or marriage as a child 08 of one or both parents; or 09 (2) was raised together with an individual for a period of time in the 10 same household and in the same manner that children who are related by blood, 11 adoption, or marriage might be. 12 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.